New York, session 2025-2026, S1268.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 239-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 239-c. Prohibition of funding to certain institutions. 1. No 4 degree-granting institution of higher education in this state shall be 5 granted any form of financial aid, or appropriated any monies from the 6 state, if such institution directly or indirectly, permits organizations 7 or activities in support of such organizations, designated as terrorist 8 organizations pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1189 on such institution's campus. 9 2. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations that 10 provides that any student group or student organization that directly or 11 indirectly promotes, encourages, advocates or engages in any activity in 12 support of a terrorist organization as defined by 8 U.S.C. § 1189, 13 receiving funding from, and that directly or indirectly promotes, 14 encourages, advocates, or permits any terrorist advocacy or activities 15 on campus, shall be ineligible for funding, including funding from 16 student activity fee proceeds and shall be banned from the use of campus 17 facilities or property. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to school 19 years commencing on and after July 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02635-01-5